apertium-es-ast.ast.dix
    <pardef n="sem/ar__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áis</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>é</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asti</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>esti</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ó</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>astis</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>estis</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aron</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aba</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abes</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aba</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ábamos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ábemos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abais</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>abeis</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aben</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ara</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>are</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aras</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ares</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ara</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  	  
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>are</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áramos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>áremos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arais</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>areis</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aran</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>aren</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  
	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>as</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>éis</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>an</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aré</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arás</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ará</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aremos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aréis</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arán</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aría</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aríes</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aría</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aríamos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>aríemos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aríais</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>aríeis</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aríen</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
        </p>

    <e><i>acollech</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>adulter</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>allegr</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>altern</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>aparent</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>aprovech</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>arrey</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>atolen</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>ayen</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>calletr</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>collech</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>confeder</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>conxel</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>desaconsey</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>desemey</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>dexener</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>emparament</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>encet</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>enguedey</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>entel</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>enxaret</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>exaxer</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>esmell</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>esperiment</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>espres</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>estrem</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>feder</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>intent</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>lleld</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>llibert</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>observ</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>oxixen</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>peñer</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>present</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>qued</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>represent</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>rexener</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>solletr</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>tent</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>lech</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>xel</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>abey</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>acallent</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>amech</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>amoyent</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>añer</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>apodrent</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>arremell</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>asoley</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>aver</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>caley</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>celebr</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>concret</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>contempl</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>depeñ</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>desaver</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>despeñ</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>dixebr</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>encaden</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>enfoller</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>enseñ</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>envelen</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>esaxer</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>esguedey</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>esper</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>espollet</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>estreld</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>esver</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>infest</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>llament</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>lliber</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>number</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>osixen</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>pen</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>preb</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>protest</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>remell</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>retey</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>sollert</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>super</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>xebr</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
